test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-asto_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - asto: # o-stems
    asto+N+Sg+Nom: asto
    asto+N+Sg+Gen: aˊsto
    asto+N+Sg+Acc: aˊsto
    asto+N+Sg+Ill: aaston
    asto+N+Sg+Loc: astoost
    asto+N+Sg+Com: astoin
    asto+N+Sg+Abe: aˊstottáá
    asto+N+Ess: aston
    asto+N+Par: astod
    asto+N+Pl+Nom: aˊstoh
    asto+N+Pl+Gen: aˊstoi
    asto+N+Pl+Acc: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Ill: astoid
    asto+N+Pl+Loc: astoin
    asto+N+Pl+Com: aˊstoiguin
    asto+N+Pl+Abe: aˊstoittáá
